sv: Konfiguration av flygplanskabin: Konferensgrupp; Besättningsvila; Divan; Dubbel klubbsittning; Fyrzonskabin; Blandad/anpassad; Enkel klubbsittning; Trezonskabin; Trippel klubbsittning; Tvåzonskabin; Övrigt
nl: Cabine-indeling vliegtuig: Conferentiegroep; Bemanningsrustruimte; Divan; Dubbele club; Cabine met vier zones; Gemengd / op maat; Enkele club; Cabine met drie zones; Drievoudige club; Cabine met twee zones; Overig
pl: Konfiguracja kabiny samolotu: Grupa konferencyjna; Strefa odpoczynku dla załogi; Kanapa; Podwójny układ klubowy; Kabina czterostrefowa; Mieszana / niestandardowa; Pojedynczy układ klubowy; Kabina trzystrefowa; Potrójny układ klubowy; Kabina dwustrefowa; Inne
vi: Cấu hình khoang hành khách máy bay: Nhóm hội thảo; Khu vực nghỉ cho phi hành đoàn; Ghế dài (Divan); Double club; Khoang 4 khu vực; Hỗn hợp / tùy chỉnh; Single club; Khoang 3 khu vực; Triple club; Khoang 2 khu vực; Khác
fr: Aménagement de la cabine de l’aéronef: Groupe de conférence; Repos de l’équipage; Divan; Double club; Cabine à quatre zones; Mixte / personnalisée; Club simple; Cabine à trois zones; Triple club; Cabine à deux zones; Autre
ja: 航空機キャビン構造: カンファレンスグループ; クルーレスト; ディバン; ダブルクラブ; 4ゾーンキャビン; 混合/カスタム; シングルクラブ; 3ゾーンキャビン; トリプルクラブ; 2ゾーンキャビン; その他
hu: Repülőgép-fülke konfigurációja: Konferenciacsoport; Személyzeti pihenő; Dívány; Double club; Négyzónás kabin; Vegyes / egyedi; Single club; Háromzónás kabin; Triple club; Kétzónás kabin; Egyéb
zh-TW: 飛機座艙配置: 會議佈局; 機組員休息區; 長沙發; 雙俱樂部式; 四區機艙; 混合/客製化; 單俱樂部式; 三區機艙; 三俱樂部式; 雙區機艙; 其他
sl-SI: Konfiguracija kabine letala: Konferenčna skupina; Prostor za počitek posadke; Divan; Dvojni klub; Štiriconska kabina; Mešano/po meri; Enojni klub; Triconska kabina; Trojni klub; Dvoconska kabina; Drugo
tr: Uçak kabini düzeni: Konferans grubu; Mürettebat dinlenme alanı; Divan; Çiftli kulüp; Dört bölgeli kabin; Karma / özel; Tekli kulüp; Üç bölgeli kabin; Üçlü kulüp; İki bölgeli kabin; Diğer
hr-HR: Konfiguracija kabine zrakoplova: Konferencijska grupa; Prostor za odmor posade; Kauč; Dvostruka klupska sjedala; Četverozonska kabina; Mješovito / po mjeri; Jednostruka klupska sjedala; Trozonska kabina; Trostruka klupska sjedala; Dvozonska kabina; Ostalo
ko: 항공기 객실 구성: 컨퍼런스 그룹; 승무원 휴식 공간; 디반; 더블 클럽; 4존 캐빈; 혼합/맞춤형; 싱글 클럽; 3존 캐빈; 트리플 클럽; 2존 캐빈; 기타
ru: Конфигурация салона самолета: Конференц-группа; Зона отдыха экипажа; Диван; Двойной клуб; Четырехзонный салон; Смешанный / индивидуальный; Одинарный клуб; Трехзонный салон; Тройной клуб; Двухзонный салон; Другое
el: Διαμόρφωση καμπίνας αεροσκάφους: Ομαδική διαρρύθμιση (συνεδρίασης); Χώρος ανάπαυσης πληρώματος; Ντιβάνι; Διάταξη Double club; Καμπίνα τεσσάρων ζωνών; Μικτή / προσαρμοσμένη; Διάταξη Single club; Καμπίνα τριών ζωνών; Διάταξη Triple club; Καμπίνα δύο ζωνών; Άλλο
de: Konfiguration der Flugzeugkabine: Konferenzgruppe; Crew-Ruhebereich; Diwan; Double Club; 4-Zonen-Kabine; Gemischt / benutzerspezifisch; Single Club; 3-Zonen-Kabine; Triple Club; 2-Zonen-Kabine; Andere
zh-CN: 飞机客舱配置: 会议组; 机组休息区; 长椅; 双俱乐部式; 四区客舱; 混合/定制; 单俱乐部式; 三区客舱; 三俱乐部式; 两区客舱; 其他
bg-BG: Конфигурация на въздухоплавателното средство: Конферентна група; Място за почивка на екипажа; Диван; Двоен клуб; Четиризонова кабина; Смесена / по поръчка; Единичен клуб; Тризонова кабина; Троен клуб; Двузонова кабина; Други
it: Configurazione della cabina dell'aereo: Gruppo conferenza; Riposo equipaggio; Divano; Double club; Cabina a quattro zone; Misto / personalizzato; Single club; Cabina a tre zone; Triple club; Cabina a due zone; Altro
cs: Provedení kabiny letadla: Konferenční uspořádání; Odpočinkový prostor posádky; Pohovka; Double club; Čtyřzónová kabina; Smíšené / na míru; Single club; Třízónová kabina; Triple club; Dvouzónová kabina; Ostatní
da: Flykabineindretning: Konferencegruppe; Hvileområde for besætning; Divan; Double club; Firezonerskabine; Blandet/tilpasset; Single club; Trezonerskabine; Triple club; Tozonerskabine; Anden
fi: Lentokoneen matkustamon konfiguraatio: Konferenssiryhmä; Miehistön lepotila; Divaani; Kaksoisklubi; Nelivyöhykkeinen matkustamo; Sekalainen / mukautettu; Yksittäisklubi; Kolmevyöhykkeinen matkustamo; Kolmoisklubi; Kaksivyöhykkeinen matkustamo; Muu
th: รูปแบบห้องโดยสารของเครื่องบิน: โต๊ะประชุม; ห้องพักลูกเรือ; โซฟายาว; คลับคู่; ห้องโดยสาร 4 โซน; แบบผสม / ปรับแต่งเอง; คลับเดี่ยว; ห้องโดยสาร 3 โซน; คลับสาม; ห้องโดยสาร 2 โซน; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Configuração da cabine da aeronave: Grupo de conferência; Descanso da tripulação; Divã; Clube duplo; Cabina de quatro zonas; Misto / personalizado; Clube simples; Cabina de três zonas; Clube triplo; Cabina de duas zonas; Outro
sk-SK: Konfigurácia kabíny lietadla: Konferenčná skupina; Odpočinok pre posádku; Pohovka; Usporiadanie Double Club; Štvorzónová kabína; Zmiešané/vlastné; Usporiadanie Single Club; Trojzónová kabína; Usporiadanie Triple Club; Dvojzónová kabína; Iné
en: Aircraft cabin configuration: Conference group; Crew rest; Divan; Double club; Four-zone cabin; Mixed / custom; Single club; Three-zone cabin; Triple club; Two-zone cabin; Other
es: Configuración de la cabina de avión: Grupo de conferencia; Descanso de la tripulación; Diván; Club doble; Cabina de cuatro zonas; Mixto/personalizado; Club individual; Cabina de tres zonas; Club triple; Cabina de dos zonas; Otro
lt-LT: Orlaivio salono konfigūracija: Konferencijų grupė; Įgulos poilsio vieta; Divanas; Dvigubas klubinis; Keturių zonų salonas; Mišri / pritaikyta; Vienas klubinis; Trijų zonų salonas; Trigubas klubinis; Dviejų zonų salonas; Kita
nb: Konfigurasjon av flykabin: Konferansegruppe; Hvileområde for mannskap; Divan; Dobbel klubbløsning; Firesoners kabin; Blandet / tilpasset; Enkel klubbløsning; Tresoners kabin; Trippel klubbløsning; Tosoners kabin; Annet
pt-BR: Configuração da cabine da aeronave: Grupo de conferência; Descanso da tripulação; Divã; Clube duplo; Cabine de quatro zonas; Misto / personalizado; Clube único; Cabine de três zonas; Clube triplo; Cabine de duas zonas; Outros
ro-RO: Configurația cabinei aeronavei: Grup de conferință; Zonă de odihnă pentru echipaj; Divan; Club dublu; Cabină cu patru zone; Mixt/personalizat; Club simplu; Cabină cu trei zone; Club triplu; Cabină cu două zone; Altele